Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2308.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Article XX-L of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a subarticle to read:SUBARTICLE EPA WORKS SCHOLARSHIP GRANT PROGRAMSection 2070-L. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this subarticle shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Approved course of study." A program offered by an institution of higher education that provides instruction in at 1234567891011121314151617181920 least one of the following:(1) Carpentry.(2) Construction safety.(3) Construction management.(4) Electrical construction or maintenance.(5) Heating, ventilation or air conditioning.(6) Masonry construction.(7) Metal fabrication.(8) Plumbing, water or environmental technology.(9) Welding or welding technology."Business firm." An entity authorized to do business in this Commonwealth and subject to taxes imposed under Article III, IV, VI, VII, VIII, IX or XV of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971."Educational cost." Tuition, mandatory fees, textbooks or other expenses paid to an institution of higher education and approved by the agency."Grant." A PA WORKS grant awarded under this subarticle."Institution of higher education." One of the following:(1) An institution of higher education that is located in this Commonwealth and approved by the agency for enrollment of grant recipients under the Higher Education Scholarship Law.(2) An institution of higher education established under Article XIX-G."Program." The Pennsylvania Workforce, Opportunity, Retention and Knowledge Scholarship Program, referred to as PA WORKS."Student." An individual who is a resident of this Commonwealth and is admitted or enrolled at an institution of 20260HB2308PN3041 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 higher education.Section 2071-L. PA WORKS Scholarship Grant Program.The PA WORKS Scholarship Grant Program is established within the agency to award grants beginning in the 2026-2027 school year.Section 2072-L. Agency duties.The agency shall:(1) Administer the program and, in its sole discretion, award grants to students who submit a completed application and satisfy the eligibility criteria in paragraph (4). The agency shall develop an application form that students may use to apply for a grant. The application of a student under 18 years of age or a student determined to be a dependent must include the signature of a parent or guardian.(2) Use money appropriated for the purpose of awarding grants, except that the agency may use up to 5% of money appropriated for the purpose of administering, implementing and servicing costs associated with the program.(3) Award a grant to a student in an amount of $5,000 per academic year or if the total amount of Federal and State grants available to the student exceeds the educational cost as determined by the agency, whichever is less. The agency, in its discretion, may provide for partial-year awards.(4) Establish eligibility criteria in order for a student to receive a grant. The criteria shall, at a minimum, include that a student must:(i) Be a resident of this Commonwealth as defined by the agency.(ii) Be enrolled in an approved course of study.(iii) Maintain satisfactory academic progress 20260HB2308PN3041 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 defined by the agency.(iv) Not have earned a bachelor's degree or the equivalent.(v) Enter into a written agreement with the agency to:(A) Satisfy all degree requirements and other requirements under this subarticle.(B) Reside and commence employment in this Commonwealth within one year after completion of an approved course of study culminating in a bachelor's or associate's degree. The employment must be in an in-demand occupation, as determined by the agency, for a period of 36 months for each academic year the student received a grant, unless the agency determines that there are extenuating circumstances. If the agency determines that there are no extenuating circumstances, residency and employment in this Commonwealth must be maintained for the duration of the qualifying employment.(C) Reimburse the Commonwealth the aggregate amount of a scholarship, including interest, received under this subarticle if the student fails to comply with clauses (A) and (B). For a student who partially satisfies the work requirement, the agency shall prorate the required reimbursement.(5) Monitor and verify a student's compliance with the agreement and enforce loan repayment of all grants for a student who does not comply with the provisions of this section, including use of all lawful collection procedures. Nothing under this paragraph shall be construed to require an 20260HB2308PN3041 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 institution of higher education to enforce any provision of this subarticle relating to repayment of funds for failure to comply with the provisions of this section.(6) Advertise, market and provide outreach to students in traditionally underserved communities and include information about the program on the agency's publicly accessible Internet website.(7) Not charge more than the three-month United States Treasury bill rate for interest on any repayment under paragraph (4)(v)(C).(8) Accept donated money from businesses for the purpose of awarding grants.(9) Not award a student a grant upon successful completion of one approved course of study.Section 2073-L. Term of grant.A grant shall be for a maximum of four academic years or the completion of a bachelor's degree, whichever occurs first.Section 2074-L. Grant priority.The agency shall:(1) Establish a process for accepting and reviewing applications. The process shall ensure that applications which meet the eligibility criteria and are complete will be awarded in the order received by the agency.(2) Give renewal applicants the opportunity of first priority in awarding grants for their renewal applications.Section 2075-L. Limitations.The number of grants shall be limited to the amount of money appropriated to the agency for the program.Section 2076-L. Termination.(a) Notification and return of money.--If a student 20260HB2308PN3041 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 terminates enrollment in the approved course of study during the academic year or prior to completion of the approved course of study, the institution of higher education shall notify the agency in writing and shall return any unused portion of the grant to the agency.(b) Construction.--Nothing in this subarticle shall be construed to change a student's eligibility for a grant if the student terminates enrollment in one approved course of study and enrolls in a different approved course of study at the same institution of higher education or another institution of higher education.Section 2077-L. Reimbursed and returned money.Money reimbursed and returned under sections 2072-L and 2076-L shall be used to provide additional grants.Section 2078-L. Taxation.A grant received by a student shall not be considered taxable income for purposes of Article III of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971.Section 2079-L. Construction.Nothing in this subarticle shall be construed to disqualify an institution of higher education from receipt of money under the act of July 18, 1974 (P.L.483, No.174), known as The Institutional Assistance Grants Act.Section 2080-L. Trade career-incentive tax credit.(a) Establishment.--A trade career-incentive tax credit is established to supplement existing Federal and State funding appropriated for grants awarded under the program.(b) Application.--A business firm applying to claim a trade career-incentive tax credit must complete and submit to the Department of Revenue a trade career-incentive tax credit 20260HB2308PN3041 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 application on a form and in a manner as determined by the Department of Revenue.(c) Approval.--If the Department of Revenue approves the business firm's application, the Department of Revenue and the business firm shall execute a commitment letter containing the following:(1) The maximum trade career-incentive tax credit amount the business firm may claim.(2) A signed statement that the business firm intends to maintain existing operations in this Commonwealth for at least five years from the start date.(3) Any other information as the Department of Revenue deems appropriate.(4) A statement authorizing the credit as a single-year or multiple-year credit.(d) Certificate.--After a commitment letter has been signed by both the Commonwealth and the business firm, the business firm shall receive a trade career-incentive tax credit certificate and filing information.Section 2081-L. Public outreach.The agency shall:(1) Actively advertise and market the program to resident students and include information about the program on the agency's publicly accessible Internet website.(2) Establish guidelines to advertise the trade career-incentive tax credit to eligible business firms.Section 2082-L. Report.The agency shall prepare and submit to the Governor, the General Assembly and the Secretary of Education an annual report detailing the operation of the program each year. The report 20260HB2308PN3041 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shall, at a minimum, include:(1) The number of new grant applicants and renewal grant applications.(2) The number of grants awarded to students.(3) The number of grants awarded to students by an approved course of study.(4) The number of grants awarded to students by an institution of higher education.(5) The average value of a grant award.(6) The number of grant recipients that are employed and meeting the work requirement under section 2072-L(4)(v)(B).(7) The number of grant recipients that are employed and meeting the work requirement by occupation.(8) The number of grant recipients that have not met the work requirement.(9) The amount of money reimbursed to the Commonwealth by grant recipients that have not met the work requirement.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260HB2308PN3041 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718